Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.330

Temporary protection orders—Extreme risk protection orders.

(1) In considering whether to issue a temporary extreme risk protection order, the court shall consider all relevant evidence, including the evidence described in RCW 7.105.215.

(2) If a court finds there is reasonable cause to believe that the respondent poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to self or others in the near future by having in the respondent's custody or control, purchasing, possessing, accessing, receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, a firearm, the court shall issue a temporary extreme risk protection order.

(3) A temporary extreme risk protection order must include:

(a) A statement of the grounds asserted for the order;

(b) The date and time the order was issued;

(c) The date and time the order expires;

(d) The address of the court in which any responsive pleading should be filed;

(e) The date and time of the scheduled hearing;

(f) A description of the requirements for the surrender of firearms under RCW 7.105.340; and

(g) The following statement: "To the subject of this protection order: This order is valid until the date and time noted above. You are required to surrender all firearms in your custody, control, or possession. You may not have in your custody or control, access, possess, purchase, receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, a firearm, or a concealed pistol license, while this order is in effect. You must surrender to the (insert name of local law enforcement agency) all firearms in your custody, control, or possession, and any concealed pistol license issued to you under RCW 9.41.070 immediately. A hearing will be held on the date and at the time noted above to determine if an extreme risk protection order should be issued. Failure to appear at that hearing may result in a court making an order against you that is valid for one year. You may seek the advice of an attorney as to any matter connected with this order."

(4) A temporary extreme risk protection order issued expires upon the full hearing on the petition for an extreme risk protection order, unless reissued by the court.

(5) A temporary extreme risk protection order must be served by a law enforcement officer in the same manner as provided for in RCW 7.105.155 for service of the notice of hearing and petition, and must be served concurrently with the notice of hearing and petition.

(6) If the court declines to issue a temporary extreme risk protection order, the court shall state the particular reasons for the court's denial.

[ 2021 c 215 s 43.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.